Missouri, session 2026, SB1521.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.180 and 137.355, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 137.180 and 137.355, to read as follows:
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property he shall forthwith notify the
record owner of such increase, either in person, or by mail
directed to the last known address; every such increase in
assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to
review by the county board of equalization whereat the
landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to
the landowner shall so state.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a
charter form of government, other than any county adopting a
charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year
of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record
owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from
such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed to

SB 1521 2
the last known address; every such increase in assessed
valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall
be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner
shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 4 and 5 of this section from the state tax
commission, for any county not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section
137.355, whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation
of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of the previous
assessed value and such increase either in person, or by
mail directed to the last known address and include in such
notice a statement indicating that the change in assessed
value may impact the record owner's tax liability and
provide all processes and deadlines for appealing
determinations of the assessed value of such property. Such
notice shall be provided in a font and format sufficient to
alert a record owner of the potential impact upon tax
liability and the appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5
of this section from the state tax commission, for all
counties not subject to the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real

SB 1521 3
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year
of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record
owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from
such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed to
the last known address; every such increase in assessed
valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall
be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner
shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsections 2 and 4 of this section, from the county
shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;

SB 1521 4
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
6. In addition to the requirements provided under
subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this section, effective January
1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and
with more than one million inhabitants, whenever any
assessor shall notify a record owner of any change in
assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that
information regarding the specific assessment method and the
basis of the computation of value for such property is
available on the assessor's website and provide the exact
website address at which such information may be accessed.
Such notification shall provide the assessor's contact
information to enable taxpayers without internet access to
100 request and receive information regarding the assessment
101 method and computation of value for such property. If any
102 third party documents, reports, or other data was relied
103 upon by the assessor in the computation of assessed value,
104 the same shall be disclosed to the record owner on the
105 assessor's website.
137.355. 1. If an assessor increases the valuation of
any tangible personal property as estimated in the itemized
list furnished to the assessor, and if an assessor increases
the valuation of any real property, he shall forthwith
notify the record owner of the increase either in person or
by mail directed to the last known address, and if the
address of the owner is unknown notice shall be given by
publication in two newspapers published in the county.

SB 1521 5
2. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 3 and 4 of this section from the state tax
commission, whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith
notify the record owner on or before June fifteenth of the
previous assessed value and such increase either in person,
or by mail directed to the last known address and include on
the face of such notice, in no less than twelve-point font,
the following statement:
NOTICE TO TAXPAYER: IF YOUR ASSESSED VALUE
HAS INCREASED, IT MAY INCREASE YOUR REAL
PROPERTY TAXES WHICH ARE DUE DECEMBER THIRTY-
FIRST. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE THAT THE VALUE OF
YOUR PROPERTY HAS INCREASED, YOU MUST CHALLENGE
THE VALUE ON OR BEFORE ______ (INSERT DATE BY
WHICH APPEAL MUST BE FILED) BY CONTACTING YOUR
COUNTY ASSESSOR.
3. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 4
of this section from the state tax commission, if an
assessor increases the valuation of any real property, the
assessor, on or before June fifteenth, shall notify the
record owner of the increase and, in a year of general
reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of
the projected tax liability likely to result from such an
increase either in person or by mail directed to the last
known address, and, if the address of the owner is unknown,
notice shall be given by publication in two newspapers
published in the county. Notice of the projected tax

SB 1521 6
liability from the county shall accompany the notice of
increased valuation from the assessor.
4. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsection 3 of this section, from the county shall
include:
(1) Record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
5. Whenever any assessor shall notify a record owner
of any increase in assessed value as required by subsection
3 of this section, such assessor shall provide notice that
information regarding the specific assessment method and the

SB 1521 7
basis of the computation of value for such property is
available on the assessor's website, and shall provide the
exact website address at which such information may be
accessed. Such notification shall provide the assessor's
contact information to enable taxpayers without internet
access to request and receive information regarding the
assessment method and computation of value for such
property. If any third-party documents, reports, or other
data was relied upon by the assessor in the computation of
assessed value, the same shall be disclosed to the record
owner on the assessor's website.
✓